Illinois, session 104th, SB1709.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Residential fire sprinkler installation credit.8    (a) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 92027, each taxpayer who has an approved NFPA 13D residential 10fire sprinkler system installed by a licensed fire sprinkler 11contractor maintaining a valid license pursuant to the Fire 12Sprinkler Contractor Licensing Act in a new or existing 13residential dwelling in the State during the taxable year 14shall be eligible, subject to the limitations in subsection 15(b), for a credit against the taxes imposed by subsections (a) 16and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to 50% of the total 17cost of the installation but not to exceed $10,000 per 18taxpayer in any taxable year. 19    (b) Credits under this Section shall be limited to the 20lesser of 2,000 credit awards per year or $8,000,000 in total 21credits per year. The Department shall adopt rules for the 22processing and awarding of credits under this Section, 23including when total filings exceed the total authorized   SB1709- 2 -LRB104 09419 HLH 19479 b1credits. 2    (c) To be eligible for a credit under this Section, a 3taxpayer shall provide to the Department a copy of the final 4invoice showing the total cost of the installation of the fire 5sprinkler system. The invoice shall include the following: 6        (1) the water main tap fee, if required; 7        (2) fees and costs for combined sprinkler and domestic 8    water service; 9        (3) costs associated with installing, modifying, or 10    upgrading piping and valves; and 11        (4) all other installation and testing fees. 12    (d) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 13the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. 14    (e) As used in this Section, "approved NFPA 13D 15residential fire sprinkler system" means a residential fire 16sprinkler system that meets the requirements of NFPA 13D 17standards established by the National Fire Protection 18Association for one-family and 2-family residential dwellings. 19    (f) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 20250. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.